North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 4. Reopening of Closed Banks. [Repealed]

§§ 53-37,
53-38.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-37; 1921, c. 4, s. 16; C.S., s. 218(q); 1927, c. 113, s. 1; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; c. 388, s. 1; 1939, c. 91, s. 2; 1995, c. 129, s. 7; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-38; 1931, c. 388, s. 4; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.